New York, session 2025-2026, A1751.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 612 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 48 to read as follows: 3 (48) For each taxable year beginning on and after January first, two 4 thousand twenty-four, an amount up to ten thousand two hundred dollars 5 of unemployment compensation received by a taxpayer. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02400-01-5